da: Lagskonstruktion: 2-lags; 2,5-lags; 3-lags; Andet
pt-PT: Estrutura em camadas: 2 camadas; 2,5 camadas; 3 camadas; Outro
vi: Kết cấu các lớp: 2 lớp; 2,5 lớp; 3 lớp; Khác
el: Κατασκευή στρώσης: 2 στρώσεων; 2,5 στρώσεων; 3 στρώσεων; Άλλο
it: Costruzione degli strati: 2 strati; 2,5 strati; 3 strati; Altro
ru: Конструкция слоев: 2-слойный; 2,5-слойный; 3-слойный; Другое
fr: Structure en couches: 2 couches; 2,5 couches; 3 couches; Autre
fi: Kerroksien rakenne: 2-kerroksinen; 2,5-kerroksinen; 3-kerroksinen; Muu
th: โครงสร้างชั้น: 2 ชั้น; 2.5 ชั้น; 3 ชั้น; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Construção da camada: 2 camadas; 2,5 camadas; 3 camadas; Outro
nb: Lagkonstruksjon: 2-lags; 2,5-lags; 3-lags; Annet
cs: Stavba vrstev: Dvouvrstvé; 2,5vrstvé; Třívrstvé; Jiné
hu: Réteges kialakítás: 2 rétegű; 2,5 rétegű; 3 rétegű; Egyéb
ko: 레이어 구조: 2 레이어; 2.5 레이어; 3 레이어; 기타
zh-TW: 疊層結構: 2 層; 2.5 層; 3 層; 其他
bg-BG: Конструкция на слоевете: 2-слойна; 2,5-слойна; 3-слойна; Друга
de: Schichtsystem: 2-lagig; 2,5-lagig; 3-lagig; Sonstige
ro-RO: Construcție pe straturi: 2 straturi; 2,5 straturi; 3 straturi; Altele
nl: Laagconstructie: 2-laags; 2,5-laags; 3-laags; Overig
sk-SK: Konštrukcia vrstvy: 2-vrstvové; 2,5-vrstvové; 3-vrstvové; Iné
lt-LT: Sluoksnio konstrukcija: 2 sluoksnių; 2,5 sluoksnio; 3 sluoksnių; Kita
pl: Konstrukcja warstwowa: 2-warstwowa; 2,5-warstwowa; 3-warstwowa; Inne
sv: Lageruppbyggnad: 2-lagers; 2,5-lagers; 3-lagers; Övrigt
ja: レイヤー構造: 2レイヤー; 2.5レイヤー; 3レイヤー; その他
hr-HR: Konstrukcija slojeva: 2-slojno; 2,5-slojno; 3-slojno; Ostalo
es: Construcción por capas: 2 capas; 2,5 capas; 3 capas; Otro
tr: Katman yapısı: 2 katmanlı; 2,5 katmanlı; 3 katmanlı; Diğer
zh-CN: 分层结构: 2 层; 2.5 层; 3 层; 其他
en: Layer construction: 2-layer; 2.5-layer; 3-layer; Other
sl-SI: Konstrukcija slojev: 2-slojno; 2,5-slojno; 3-slojno; Drugo